Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB56.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 205 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
The Department for Medicaid Services, any managed care organization with whom the
department contracts for the delivery of Medicaid services, and the state pharmacy
benefit manager contracted by the department pursuant to KRS 205.5512 shall not:
(1) Deny coverage of a nonopioid prescription drug in favor of an opioid prescription
drug when a licensed physician has prescribed a nonopioid medication for the
treatment of chronic or acute pain; or
(2) Establish more restrictive or more extensive utilization controls, including but not
limited to more restrictive or more extensive prior authorization or step therapy
requirements, for clinically appropriate nonopioid drugs than the least restrictive
or extensive utilization controls applicable to any clinically appropriate opioid or
narcotic drug.
Section 2. If the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or the Department for
Medicaid Services determines that a state plan amendment, waiver, or any other form of
authorization or approval from any federal agency to implement Section 1 of this Act is
necessary to prevent the loss of federal funds or to comply with federal law, the cabinet
or department:
(1) Shall, within 90 days after the effective date of this section, request the
necessary federal authorization or approval to implement Section 1 of this Act; and
(2) May only delay implementation of the provisions of Section 1 of this Act for
which federal authorization or approval was deemed necessary until the federal
authorization or approval is granted.
Section 3. Sections 1 and 2 of this Act shall constitute the specific authorization
Page 1 of 2
BR102700.100 - 1027 - XXXX 2/27/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1027
required under KRS 205.5372(1).
Page 2 of 2
BR102700.100 - 1027 - XXXX 2/27/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed